North Dakota, session 69, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 49-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Public interest exemption - Rate regulation.
The commission may exempt an electric public utility from a regulation that affects rates,
contracts, services rendered, adequacy, or sufficiency of facilities, or the rules or restrictions of
a public utility if the commission finds an exemption in the public interest. The commission may
apply terms and conditions to an exemption under this section as the commission deems
reasonable and proper. This section does not limit the authority of the commission granted
under chapter 49 - 03. An exemption under this section may be revoked or suspended in the
manner prescribed by chapter 28 - 32 .
Page No. 1 25.8060.01000